Massachusetts, session 194th, H3319.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 39 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after line 99, the following definition:- 
“Covered municipal official”, a mayor, city manager, city councilor, member of the board 
of alderman, school committee member or municipal department head in a city having more than 
150,000 inhabitants as of the most recent federal census.”, and further; 
By inserting after line 169, the following definitions:- ““Municipal agent”, a person who 
for compensation or reward engages in municipal lobbying which includes at least 1 lobbying 
communication with a government employee made by said person. The term “municipal agent” 
shall include a person who, as part of his regular and usual business or professional activities and 

of 9 10 not simply incidental thereto, engages in legislative municipal lobbying, whether or not any 
compensation in addition to the salary for such activities is received for such services. For 
purposes of this definition a person shall be presumed to be engaged in municipal lobbying that 
is simply incidental to his regular and usual business or professional activities if he or she: (i) 
engages in municipal lobbying for not more than 25 hours during any reporting period; and (ii) 
receives less than $2,500 during any reporting period for legislative lobbying. 
“Municipal lobbying”, any act to promote, oppose, influence, or attempt to influence the 
decision of any covered municipal official, where such decision concerns any ordinance 
proposed or change to an adopted ordinance, action or vote of a covered municipal official or the 
adoption, repeal, amendment or postponement of a standard, rate, rule, regulation or appointment 
within a covered municipal official’s direct jurisdiction or the approval, modification or 
disapproval of any formal action by a covered municipal.” 
SECTION 2. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “legislative agents” in line 7 the 
following words:- “, municipal agents”. 
SECTION 3. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “legislative” in line 9 the 
following word:- “, municipal”. 
SECTION 4. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition,  is hereby amended by inserting after the words “legislative agent” in line 20 the 
following words:- “, municipal agent”. 

of 9 31  SECTION 5. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition,  is hereby amended by inserting after the words “legislative agent” in line 25 the 
following words :- “, municipal agent”. 
SECTION 6. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition,  is hereby amended by inserting after the words “legislative agent” in line 31 the 
following words :- “, municipal agent”. 
SECTION 7. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence after the second sentence 
in line 5:- The state secretary shall assess each municipal agent an annual filing fee of $50 upon 
entering the agent’s name on the docket. 
SECTION 8. Section 41 of chapter 3 of the General, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition,  is hereby amended by inserting after the words “legislative agent” in lines 48 and 49 the 
following words :- “, municipal agent”. 
SECTION 9. Section 42 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following sentence at the end of the first 
paragraph in line 8:- 
No person shall agree to engage in municipal lobbying for consideration to be paid upon 
the contingency of the outcome of the actions described in the definition of “municipal 
lobbying.” 

of 9 50  SECTION 10. Section 43 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new sentence after the first 
sentence of the first paragraph in line 29:- 
On or before the fifteenth day of July, complete from January first through June thirtieth; 
and the fifteenth day of January, complete from July first to December thirty-first of the 
preceding year, every municipal agent shall render to the state secretary an itemized statement, 
under oath, listing all campaign contributions as defined in section one of chapter fifty-five; all 
expenditures, and the total amount thereof, incurred, contributed or paid during the reporting 
period in the course of his employment as a municipal agent and all expenditures made for or on 
behalf of covered municipal officials incurred or paid during the reporting period, except that the 
municipal agent shall not be required to report such expenditures not in the course of his 
employment made for or on behalf of the immediate family of such municipal agent or a relative 
within the third degree of consanguinity of the municipal agent or of his or her spouse or the 
spouse of any such relative; and except that in the case of all expenditures the municipal agent 
shall not be required to itemize the expenditures of any one day in which the amount incurred or 
paid did not total thirty-five dollars or more. 
SECTION 11. Section 43 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the first sentence of the third paragraph contained 
in lines 41 to 54, inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the following text: 
Every legislative agent, municipal agent and executive agent shall include in the 
statement required by this section for the relevant reporting period: (1) the identification of each 
client for whom the legislative, municipal or executive agent provided lobbying services; (2) a 

of 9 72 list of all bill numbers and names of legislation and other governmental action that the executive, 
municipal or legislative agent acted to promote, oppose or influence; (3) a statement of the 
executive, municipal or legislative agent's position, if any, on each such bill or other 
governmental action; (4) the identification of the client or clients on whose behalf the executive, 
municipal or legislative agent was acting with respect to each such bill or governmental action; 
(5) the amount of compensation received for executive, municipal or legislative lobbying from 
each client with respect to such lobbying services; and (6) all direct business associations with 
public officials. The disclosure shall be required regardless of whether the legislative agent, 
municipal agent or executive agent specifically referenced the bill number or name, or other 
governmental action while acting to promote, oppose or influence legislation, and shall be as 
complete as practicable. 
SECTION 12. Section 43 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 60 the 
following word:- “, municipal”. 
SECTION 13. Section 43 of chapter 3 of the General, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 67 the following 
word:- “, municipal”. 
SECTION 14. Section 43 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 77 the 
following word:- “, municipal”. 
SECTION 15. Section 44 of chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting the following new sentence after the first sentence in line 26 of the first paragraph:- 

of 9 94  On or before the fifteenth day of July, complete from January first through June thirtieth; 
and the fifteenth day of January, complete from July first to December thirty-first of the 
preceding year, any group or organization, however constituted, not employing a municipal 
agent which as part of an organized effort, expends in excess of two hundred and fifty dollars 
during any calendar year to promote, oppose, or influence municipal governmental action, or to 
influence the decision of any officer or employee of a covered municipal official, where such 
100 decision concern the adoption, defeat or postponement of a standard, rate, rule or regulation 
101 pursuant thereto, or to do any act to communicate directly with a covered municipal official to 
102 influence a decision concerning policy or procurement shall register with the state secretary by 
103 rendering a statement, under oath, containing the names and addresses of the principals of such 
104 group or organization, the purposes of the organization, such aforesaid decisions of such 
105 employees of the executive branch or an authority or legislation which affects those purposes, 
106 the total amount of expenditures, incurred or paid during the reporting period in furtherance of 
107 the foregoing objectives and an itemized statement containing all expenditures made for or on 
108 behalf of covered municipal officials and employees of such offices. 
109  SECTION 16. Section 44 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
110 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 56 the 
111 following word:- “, municipal”. 
112  SECTION 17. Section 44 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
113 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the text contained in the last paragraph in lines 
114 62 to 76, inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph: 

of 9 115  This section shall not apply to any group or organization that (i) does not employ an 
116 executive, municipal or legislative agent; (ii) does not realize a profit; (iii) does not make a 
117 contribution, as defined in section one of chapter fifty-five, to a political candidate or committee; 
118 (iv) does not pay a salary or fee to any member for any activities performed for the benefit of the 
119 group or organization; and (v) expends two thousand dollars or less during any calendar year to 
120 promote, oppose, or influence legislation, or the governor's veto or approval thereof, or to 
121 influence the decision of any officer or employee of the executive branch or an authority, 
122 including, but not limited to, statewide constitutional officers and employees thereof, or a 
123 covered municipal official and employees thereof, where such decision concerns legislation or 
124 the adoption, defeat or postponement of a standard, rate, rule or regulation pursuant thereto or 
125 other government action, or to do any act to communicate directly with a covered executive 
126 official or covered municipal official to influence a decision concerning policy or procurement. 
127  SECTION 18. Section 45 of chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
128 inserting the following the words in the subsection (d) after the words “executive lobbying”:- , 
129 municipal lobbying. 
130  SECTION 19. Section 45 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
131 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 96 the 
132 following word:- “, municipal”. 
133  SECTION 20. Section 46 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
134 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 1 the 
135 following word:- “, municipal”. 

of 9 136  SECTION 21. Section 47 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
137 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first sentence contained in lines 1 to 25, 
138 inclusive, and inserting in place thereof the following text: 
139  “On or before the fifteenth day of July, complete from January first through June 
140 thirtieth; and the fifteenth day of January, complete from July first to December thirty-first of the 
141 preceding year, every employer of an executive, municipal or legislative agent shall render to the 
142 state secretary a complete and detailed itemized statement, under oath, listing all expenditures 
143 incurred or paid separately by such employer during the reporting period in connection with 
144 promoting, opposing or influencing legislation, or the governor's approval or veto thereof, or 
145 influencing the decision of any officer or employee of the executive branch or an authority, 
146 including, but not limited to, statewide constitutional officers and employees thereof, or a 
147 covered municipal official and employees thereof, where such decision concerns legislation or 
148 the adoption, defeat or postponement of a standard, rate, rule or regulation pursuant thereto or 
149 other government action, or to do any act to communicate directly with a covered executive 
150 official or covered municipal official to influence a decision concerning policy or procurement  
151 and all expenditures for or on behalf of the statewide constitutional officers, officers and 
152 employees of such offices, members of the general court, officers and employees of the general 
153 court, officers and employees of the executive branch and officers and employees of an 
154 authority, covered municipal officials and any employees thereof and the total amount thereof 
155 incurred or paid separately by such employer during the reporting period; and except that in the 
156 case of all expenditures the employer shall not be required to itemize the expenditures of any one 
157 day in which the amount incurred or paid did not total thirty-five dollars or more.” 

of 9 158  SECTION 22. Section 47 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
159 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in line 47 the 
160 following word:- “, municipal”. 
161  SECTION 23. Section 48 of chapter 3 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
162 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “executive” in lines 6 and 8, as it 
163 appears in each instance, the following word:- “, municipal”.